sk-SK: Podpora technológie paralelného spracovania: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; HTT; Multi-GPU; Viacjadrový; OpenCL; SIMD; Iné
hr-HR: Podrška za tehnologiju paralelne obrade: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper Threading; Multi-GPU; Višejezgreni; OpenCL; SIMD; Ostalo
sv: Stöd för parallell bearbetningsteknik: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper Threading; Multi-GPU; Flerkärnig; OpenCL; SIMD; Övrigt
hu: Párhuzamos feldolgozási technológia támogatása: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Egyéb
ja: 並列処理テクノロジーのサポート: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; ハイパースレッディング; マルチGPU; マルチコア; OpenCL; SIMD; その他
pt-BR: Tecnologia de processamento paralelo com suporte: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hiper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-núcleo; OpenCL; SIMD; Outro
zh-TW: 平行處理技術支援: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; 超執行緒; 多 GPU; 多核心; OpenCL; SIMD; 其他
th: รองรับเทคโนโลยีการประมวลผลแบบขนาน: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Suport tehnologie de procesare paralelă: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Altele
de: Unterstützung von Parallelverarbeitungstechnologie: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-Threading; Multi-GPU; Mehrere Kerne; OpenCL; SIMD; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Assistência à tecnologia de processamento paralelo: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Outro
vi: Hỗ trợ công nghệ xử lý song song: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Siêu phân luồng; Đa GPU; Đa lõi; OpenCL; SIMD; Khác
el: Υποστήριξη τεχνολογίας παράλληλης επεξεργασίας: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Υπερνηματική; Πολλαπλών GPU; Πολλαπλών πυρήνων; OpenCL; SIMD; Άλλο
fi: Tuettu rinnakkainen käsittelytekniikka: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hypersäikeistys; Multi-GPU; Moniytiminen; OpenCL; SIMD; Muu
nl: Ondersteuning voor parallelle verwerkingstechnologie: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyperthreading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Andere
tr: Paralel İşleme Teknolojisi Desteği: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hiper işletim dizisi; Multi-GPU; Çok çekirdekli; OpenCL; SIMD; Diğer
fr: Prise en charge de la technologie de traitement parallèle: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multicœur; OpenCL; SIMD; Autre
it: Supporto per la tecnologia di elaborazione parallela: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Altro
sl-SI: Podpora tehnologiji vzporedne obdelave: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Večnitenje; Multi-GPU; Večjedrni; OpenCL; SIMD; Drugo
ko: 병렬 처리 기술 지원: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; 하이퍼스레딩; 멀티GPU; 멀티코어; OpenCL; SIMD; 기타
lt-LT: Lygiagretaus veikimo technologijos palaikymas: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; „Hyper-threading“; „Multi-GPU“; Kelių branduolių; „OpenCL“; SIMD; Kita
en: Parallel processing technology support: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Other
da: Understøttelse af parallel behandlingsteknologi: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Andet
zh-CN: 并行处理技术支持: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; 超线程; 多 GPU; 多核; OpenCL; SIMD; 其他
cs: Podpora technologie paralelního zpracování: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Vícejádrová; OpenCL; SIMD; Jiné
nb: Støtte for parallel behandlingsteknologi: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Annet
bg-BG: Поддръжка на технология за паралелна обработка: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Многоядрен; OpenCL; SIMD; Други
ru: Поддержка технологии параллельной обработки: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Гиперпоточность; Multi-GPU; Многоядерный; OpenCL; SIMD; Другой
pl: Obsługa technologii przetwarzania równoległego: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hyper-threading; Multi-GPU; Multi-core; OpenCL; SIMD; Inne
es: Compatibilidad de tecnología de procesamiento paralelo: AVX; CUDA; FMA; GPGPU; HSA; Hiperprocesamiento; Multi-GPU; Multinúcleo; OpenCL; SIMD; Otros